Louisiana, session 2026, SB316.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:167(C), (D), and (E) are hereby amended and reenacted and R.S.
15:167(F) and (G) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§167. Louisiana Public Defender Fund
* * *
C.(1) The minimum amount appropriated to the LPD Fund shall be
determined by multiplying the combined number of district attorney and
assistant district attorney warrants, as described in R.S. 16:51, by the actual
assistant district attorney warrant value in addition to a supplement of fifteen
thousand dollars per district attorney and assistant district attorney warrant.
(2) The actual assistant district attorney warrant value includes the
warrant amount described in R.S. 16:11 for each assistant district attorney plus
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SLS 26RS-341 ORIGINAL
SB NO. 316
the value of retirement and benefits.
(3) The supplement per district attorney and assistant district attorney
warrant may be used to fund the office's administrative and contractual
obligations.
D. Monies in the fund shall be appropriated and used solely and exclusively
to provide for the implementation of the Louisiana Public Defender Act and the
program.
D. E. The LPD Fund shall be administered by the office as authorized by the
provisions of the Louisiana Public Defender Act. The office is hereby authorized to
establish such accounts or sub-accounts within the LPD Fund as deemed necessary
to comply with the provisions of the Louisiana Public Defender Act and the program.
E. F. The office shall dedicate and disburse at least seventy-five percent of
the entirety of its annual budget and its funds in the LPD Fund as defined in
Subsection A of this Section each fiscal year to the offices of the district public
defenders and their indigent defender funds as defined in R.S. 15:168(A) in the
various judicial districts throughout the state. The provisions of this Subsection shall
not apply to statutorily dedicated funds or funds received through the awarding of
grants.
G. The state public defender shall have the authority to allocate the LPD
Fund to provide district supplemental assistance as required by R.S.
15:152(B)(1).